Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-9005
Domestic Violence and Sex Trafficking Survivor Housing Assistance Fund; created; use; investment.

The Domestic Violence and Sex Trafficking Survivor Housing Assistance Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the department and shall contain money transferred by the Legislature and money received from any public or private source. The fund shall be used for purposes of the Domestic Violence and Sex Trafficking Survivor Assistance Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2025, LB78, § 4.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.